Utah statutes.
41-6a-607.   Speed violation -- Complaint -- Civil negligence.

(1) For a charge of violation of a speed provision under this part, the citation or information shall specify the:

(a)  speed at which the defendant is alleged to have operated a vehicle; and

(b)  speed limit applicable to the section of the highway where the violation is alleged to have occurred.

(2)  The provisions of this part declaring prima facie speed limitations do not relieve the plaintiff in any civil action from the burden of proving negligence on the part of the defendant as the proximate cause of an accident.

